Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB701.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of March 4, 1970 (P.L.128, No.49), entitled "An act granting to the Governor of the Commonwealth the sole authority for regulating the display of the flag of the United States from any public ground or building and from any ground or building of certain other institutions," is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. * * *(a.1) Each flag of the United States that is subject to the authority of the Governor of the Commonwealth under subsection (a) shall be manufactured in the United States.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0701PN0721 - 2 - 1